Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, HB2658.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Section 15-808.01, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE15-808.01. Virtual schools; proctored assessments; virtual setting; exemptions; definitions A. Except as provided in subsection C of this section, each virtual school may administer any assessment that complies with section 15-741 in a virtual setting, if the virtual school does all of the following: 1. Assigns a specific date and time to administer the assessment to participating students in a virtual setting, except as provided in subsection B of this section. 2. Administers the assessment in a synchronous session that is initiated and managed by personnel who are designated by the virtual school. 3. Provides at least one proctor for every ten participating students to monitor the participating students through synchronous video for the entire testing session.  For the purposes of this paragraph, if the testing platform does not allow integrated camera proctoring, the virtual school shall require each participating student to use a second device to provide the proctor with synchronous video that shows the student and the area immediately surrounding the student for the entire testing session. 4. Requires each participating student to remain in the virtual setting until the student is instructed to exit the testing platform by the student's assigned proctor. 5. Verifies each assessment that is submitted by a participating student in a virtual setting pursuant to this subsection. B. A virtual school that administers an assessment pursuant to subsection A of this section may also administer the assessment in person to any specific student or group of students at a date and time assigned by the virtual school if the virtual school identifies an exception to the virtual setting that is necessary or appropriate, including an exception for a student who has one or more testing accommodations in the student's individualized education program as defined in section 15-761 or section 504 plan as defined in section 15-731 or for an English learner as defined in section 15-751 who needs an in-person assessment. C. A virtual school may not administer any of the following pursuant to subsection A of this section unless the assessment is available to be proctored in a virtual setting: 1. A college readiness or workforce assessment provided by a national college and career readiness assessment provider. 2. An advanced placement examination. 3. An international baccalaureate examination. 4. An alternate assessment as indicated in a student's individualized education program as defined in section 15-761. 5. An English language proficiency assessment administered pursuant to section 15-756. D. When sufficient monies are available, the department of education shall include a provision for testing in a virtual setting pursuant to subsection A of this section in each contract that the department executes or extends with a third-party vendor for the provision of any assessment that is not listed in subsection C of this section.  Notwithstanding subsection A of this section, a virtual school may not begin administering an assessment pursuant to subsection A of this section until the first school year after the school year in which the department executes or extends a contract or executes a contract amendment for the assessment that includes the provision prescribed by this subsection. E. This section does not require a virtual school to administer any assessment, including the assessments listed in subsection C of this section, in a virtual setting. F. For the purposes of this section: 1. "Assessment" means a formal assessment, test or examination that a public school in this state is required by state or federal law to administer to students who are enrolled in the school. 2. "Virtual school" includes: (a) a school that participates in Arizona online instruction pursuant to section 15-808. (b) A dropout recovery program that is provided online pursuant to section 15-901.06. END_STATUTE Sec. 2. Repeal Section 15-901.06, Arizona Revised Statutes, is repealed.